Hawaii statutes.
§11-97 Records open to inspection.
(a) A voter's full name, district/precinct designation, and voter status shall
be public; but all other personal information, as provided on the voter
registration affidavit, shall be confidential except for election or government
purposes in accordance with rules adopted by the chief election officer,
pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) Voted materials shall not be open to the
inspection of any voter until after the end of the contest period unless opened
upon order of the court. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(dd); am
L 1983, c 34, §12; am L 1990, c 156, §8; am L 1997, c 157, §2]

Cross References

Government records, see chapter 92F.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next